Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3623
Warrants; registration; sewerage fund.

For the purpose of paying the cost of construction of such sewerage disposal system and plant or plants, the county board may issue warrants in amounts not to exceed the total sum of the sewer tax levy provided in section 23-3616, which warrants shall bear interest at such rate as the county board orders. When there are no funds immediately available for the payment of the warrants, they shall be registered in the manner provided for the registration of other warrants and called and paid whenever there are funds available for the purpose in the manner provided for the calling and paying of other warrants. For the purpose of paying the warrants and the interest thereon from the time of their registration until paid, the sewer tax levy provided in such section shall be kept as it is paid and collected in a fund to be designated and known as the sewerage fund into which all money levied for such improvements shall be paid as collected and out of which all warrants issued for such purposes shall be paid.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 23.